Illinois, session 104th, HB1614.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-168 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-168)7    Sec. 15-168. Homestead exemption for persons with 8disabilities.9    (a) Beginning with taxable year 2007, an annual homestead 10exemption is granted to persons with disabilities in the 11amount of $2,000, except as provided in subsection (c), to be 12deducted from the property's value as equalized or assessed by 13the Department of Revenue. The person with a disability shall 14receive the homestead exemption upon meeting the following 15requirements:16        (1) The property must be occupied as the primary 17    residence by the person with a disability.18        (2) The person with a disability must be liable for 19    paying the real estate taxes on the property.20        (3) The person with a disability must be an owner of 21    record of the property or have a legal or equitable 22    interest in the property as evidenced by a written 23    instrument. In the case of a leasehold interest in   HB1614- 2 -LRB104 05851 HLH 15882 b1    property, the lease must be for a single family residence.2    A person who has a disability during the taxable year is 3eligible to apply for this homestead exemption during that 4taxable year. Application must be made during the application 5period in effect for the county of residence. If a homestead 6exemption has been granted under this Section and the person 7awarded the exemption subsequently becomes a resident of a 8facility licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act, the 9Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the 10ID/DD Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, then the exemption 11shall continue (i) so long as the residence continues to be 12occupied by the qualifying person's spouse or (ii) if the 13residence remains unoccupied but is still owned by the person 14qualified for the homestead exemption.15    (b) For the purposes of this Section, "person with a 16disability" means a person unable to engage in any substantial 17gainful activity by reason of a medically determinable 18physical or mental impairment which can be expected to result 19in death or has lasted or can be expected to last for a 20continuous period of not less than 12 months. Persons with 21disabilities filing claims under this Act shall submit proof 22of disability in such form and manner as the Department shall 23by rule and regulation prescribe. Proof that a claimant is 24eligible to receive disability benefits under the Federal 25Social Security Act shall constitute proof of disability for 26purposes of this Act. Issuance of an Illinois Person with a   HB1614- 3 -LRB104 05851 HLH 15882 b1Disability Identification Card stating that the claimant is 2under a Class 2 disability, as defined in Section 4A of the 3Illinois Identification Card Act, shall constitute proof that 4the person named thereon is a person with a disability for 5purposes of this Act. A person with a disability not covered 6under the Federal Social Security Act and not presenting an 7Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card stating 8that the claimant is under a Class 2 disability shall be 9examined by a physician, optometrist (if the person qualifies 10because of a visual disability), advanced practice registered 11nurse, or physician assistant designated by the Department, 12and his status as a person with a disability determined using 13the same standards as used by the Social Security 14Administration. The costs of any required examination shall be 15borne by the claimant. An applicant who receives an exemption 16under this Section and who submits documentation by the 17examining physician, optometrist (if the person qualifies 18because of a visual disability), advanced practice registered 19nurse, or physician assistant that the applicant is totally 20and permanently disabled need not be reexamined to receive the 21exemption under this Section in a subsequent taxable year, 22provided that (i) the applicant attaches the original 23documentation of total and permanent disability to his or her 24application in the subsequent taxable year, (ii) the exemption 25has not been deemed erroneous since the last application, and 26(iii) the claimant has not reported their ineligibility to   HB1614- 4 -LRB104 05851 HLH 15882 b1receive the exemption. 2    (c) For land improved with (i) an apartment building owned 3and operated as a cooperative or (ii) a life care facility as 4defined under Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities Act that is 5considered to be a cooperative, the maximum reduction from the 6value of the property, as equalized or assessed by the 7Department, shall be multiplied by the number of apartments or 8units occupied by a person with a disability. The person with a 9disability shall receive the homestead exemption upon meeting 10the following requirements:11        (1) The property must be occupied as the primary 12    residence by the person with a disability.13        (2) The person with a disability must be liable by 14    contract with the owner or owners of record for paying the 15    apportioned property taxes on the property of the 16    cooperative or life care facility. In the case of a life 17    care facility, the person with a disability must be liable 18    for paying the apportioned property taxes under a life 19    care contract as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care 20    Facilities Act.21        (3) The person with a disability must be an owner of 22    record of a legal or equitable interest in the cooperative 23    apartment building. A leasehold interest does not meet 24    this requirement. 25If a homestead exemption is granted under this subsection, the 26cooperative association or management firm shall credit the   HB1614- 5 -LRB104 05851 HLH 15882 b1savings resulting from the exemption to the apportioned tax 2liability of the qualifying person with a disability. The 3chief county assessment officer may request reasonable proof 4that the association or firm has properly credited the 5exemption. A person who willfully refuses to credit an 6exemption to the qualified person with a disability is guilty 7of a Class B misdemeanor. 8    (d) The chief county assessment officer shall determine 9the eligibility of property to receive the homestead exemption 10according to guidelines established by the Department. After a 11person has received an exemption under this Section, an annual 12verification of eligibility for the exemption shall be mailed 13to the taxpayer.14    In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 15chief county assessment officer shall provide to each person 16granted a homestead exemption under this Section a form to 17designate any other person to receive a duplicate of any 18notice of delinquency in the payment of taxes assessed and 19levied under this Code on the person's qualifying property. 20The duplicate notice shall be in addition to the notice 21required to be provided to the person receiving the exemption 22and shall be given in the manner required by this Code. The 23person filing the request for the duplicate notice shall pay 24an administrative fee of $5 to the chief county assessment 25officer. The assessment officer shall then file the executed 26designation with the county collector, who shall issue the   HB1614- 6 -LRB104 05851 HLH 15882 b1duplicate notices as indicated by the designation. A 2designation may be rescinded by the person with a disability 3in the manner required by the chief county assessment officer.4    (d-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 5chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 6the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 7that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 8year, provided that: 9        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 10    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 11    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 12        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 13    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 14    as of January 1, 2019; 15        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 16    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 17    this Code; and 18        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 19    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 20    taxable years. 21    (d-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 22chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 23the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property 24that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 25year, if:26        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as   HB1614- 7 -LRB104 05851 HLH 15882 b1    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 2    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;3        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 4    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 5    as of January 1, 2020;6        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 7    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 8    this Code; and9        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 10    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 11    taxable years. 12    (d-15) For taxable years 2022 through 2027, in any county 13of more than 3,000,000 residents, and in any other county 14where the county board has authorized such action by ordinance 15or resolution, a chief county assessment officer may renew 16this exemption for any person who applied for the exemption 17and presented proof of eligibility, as described in subsection 18(b), without an annual application as required under 19subsection (d). A chief county assessment officer shall not 20automatically renew an exemption under this subsection if: the 21physician, advanced practice registered nurse, optometrist, or 22physician assistant who examined the claimant determined that 23the disability is not expected to continue for 12 months or 24more; the exemption has been deemed erroneous since the last 25application; or the claimant has reported their ineligibility 26to receive the exemption. A chief county assessment officer   HB1614- 8 -LRB104 05851 HLH 15882 b1who automatically renews an exemption under this subsection 2shall notify a person of a subsequent determination not to 3automatically renew that person's exemption and shall provide 4that person with an application to renew the exemption. 5    (e) A taxpayer who claims an exemption under Section 615-165 or 15-169 may not claim an exemption under this 7Section. 8(Source: P.A. 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 102-895, eff. 5-23-22; 9103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)